src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON LIEHKET !!= @CODE@
                                 +Inf:liehket      K-CONS ; ! should I use årrot? (No! TO)
                           +Actio+Ess:liehkemin    K-CONS ;
                           +Actio+Ela:liehkemis    K-CONS ;
                              +PrfPrc:læhkám       K-CONS ;
! Present
      +Ind+Prs+Sg1:lav    K      ;
      +Ind+Prs+Sg2:la     K      ;
      +Ind+Prs+Sg3:la     K      ;
!  +Ind+Prs+Sg2+v2:le     K      ;
!  +Ind+Prs+Sg3+v2:le     K      ;
  +Ind+Prs+Sg3+Clt:l      ENDLEX ;
!     +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>l    ENDLEX ;
      +Ind+Prs+Du1:lin    K      ;
      +Ind+Prs+Du2:lihppe K      ;
      +Ind+Prs+Du3:libá   K      ;
      +Ind+Prs+Pl1:lip    K      ;
      +Ind+Prs+Pl2:lihpit K      ;
      +Ind+Prs+Pl3:li     K      ;



! Present in questions
           +Ind+Prs+Sg1+SentInit:lev          K      ;
           +Ind+Prs+Sg2+SentInit:le           K      ;
           +Ind+Prs+Sg3+SentInit:le           K      ;
           +Ind+Prs+Du1+SentInit:len          K      ;
  +Ind+Prs+Sg1+SentInit+Err/Orth:læv          K      ; !
  +Ind+Prs+Sg2+SentInit+Err/Orth:læ           K      ; !
  +Ind+Prs+Sg3+SentInit+Err/Orth:læ           K      ; !
  +Ind+Prs+Du1+SentInit+Err/Orth:læn          K      ; !
           +Ind+Prs+Du2+SentInit:læhppe       K      ;
           +Ind+Prs+Du3+SentInit:læbá         K      ;
           +Ind+Prs+Pl1+SentInit:lep          K      ;
  +Ind+Prs+Pl1+SentInit+Err/Orth:læp          K      ; !
           +Ind+Prs+Pl2+SentInit:lehpit       K      ;
           +Ind+Prs+Pl3+SentInit:le           K      ;
  +Ind+Prs+Pl3+SentInit+Err/Orth:læ           K      ; !


! Past
           +Ind+Prt+Sg1:lidjiv K-CONS ;
           +Ind+Prt+Sg2:lidji  K-VOW  ;
           +Ind+Prt+Sg3:lij    K-CONS ;
!       +Ind+Prt+Sg3+v2:lej    K-CONS ; !SentInit
           +Ind+Prt+Du1:lijma  K-VOW  ;
  +Ind+Prt+Du1+Err/Orth:lijme  K      ; !
           +Ind+Prt+Du2:lijda  K-VOW  ;
  +Ind+Prt+Du2+Err/Orth:lijde  K      ; !
           +Ind+Prt+Du3:lijga  K-VOW  ;
           +Ind+Prt+Pl1:lijma  K-VOW  ;
  +Ind+Prt+Pl1+Err/Orth:lijme  K      ; !
           +Ind+Prt+Pl2:lijda  K-VOW  ;
  +Ind+Prt+Pl2+Err/Orth:lijde  K      ; !
           +Ind+Prt+Pl3:lidjin K-CONS ;


! Past in questions
           +Ind+Prt+Sg1+SentInit:ledjiv       K      ;
           +Ind+Prt+Sg2+SentInit:ledji        K      ;
           +Ind+Prt+Sg3+SentInit:lej          K      ;
           +Ind+Prt+Du1+SentInit:lejma        K      ;
  +Ind+Prt+Du1+SentInit+Err/Orth:lejme        K      ; !
           +Ind+Prt+Du2+SentInit:lejda        K      ;
  +Ind+Prt+Du2+SentInit+Err/Orth:lejde        K      ; !
           +Ind+Prt+Du3+SentInit:lejga        K      ;
           +Ind+Prt+Pl1+SentInit:lejma        K      ;
  +Ind+Prt+Pl1+SentInit+Err/Orth:lejme        K      ; !
  +Ind+Prt+Pl2+SentInit+Err/Orth:lejde        K      ; !
           +Ind+Prt+Pl2+SentInit:lejda        K      ;
           +Ind+Prt+Pl3+SentInit:ledjin       K      ;

! Potensialis
                             +Pot+Sg1:littjav      K      ;
                             +Pot+Sg2:littja       K      ;
                             +Pot+Sg3:lisj         K      ;
                      +Pot+Sg3+Use/NG:lesj         K      ;
                             +Pot+Du1:littjin      K      ;
                             +Pot+Du2:littjabihtte K      ;
                             +Pot+Du3:littjaba     K      ;
                             +Pot+Pl1:littjap      K      ;
                             +Pot+Pl2:littjabihtit K      ;
                    +Pot+Pl2+Err/Orth:littjabehtit K      ; !
                             +Pot+Pl3:littji       K      ;
                    +Pot+Pl3+Err/Orth:littjij      K      ;


! Imperative
                           +Imprt+Sg2:liege        ENDLEX ;
                           +Imprt+Sg3:liehkis      ENDLEX ;
                  +Imprt+Sg3+Err/Orth:lehkis       ENDLEX ; !
                           +Imprt+Du1:læhkon       ENDLEX ;
                           +Imprt+Du2:liehkke      ENDLEX ;
                           +Imprt+Du3:liehkiska    ENDLEX ;
                           +Imprt+Pl1:læhkop       ENDLEX ;
                           +Imprt+Pl2:liehkit      ENDLEX ;
                           +Imprt+Pl3:liehkisa     ENDLEX ;

! Imperative II
                         +ImprtII+Sg2:lehku        ENDLEX ;
                         +ImprtII+Sg3:lehkus       ENDLEX ;
                         +ImprtII+Du1:lehkun       ENDLEX ;
                         +ImprtII+Du2:lehkuda      ENDLEX ;
                         +ImprtII+Du3:lehkuska     ENDLEX ;
                         +ImprtII+Pl1:lehkup       ENDLEX ;
                         +ImprtII+Pl2:lehkut       ENDLEX ;
                         +ImprtII+Pl3:lehkusa      ENDLEX ;
                +ImprtII+Pl3+Err/Orth:liehkusa     ENDLEX ; !


! Contracted Neg + Cop forms
                     +Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ilºla        K      ;
              +Use/NG+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ilºle        K      ; !Variant
            +Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Err/Orth:ilºlæ        K      ; !
                     +Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ælºla        K      ;
              +Use/NG+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ælºle        K      ; !Variant
            +Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:ælºlæ        K      ; !
                     +Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg2:ilºlim       K      ;
                     +Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:ælºlim       K      ;
                     +Err/Orth+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:ælºlam       K      ; !Used in Anta Pirak, and "lam" is quite usual instead of "lim" in orl language
                         +Neg+Pot+Pl3:ælºlittja    K      ;


! Negative forms
!               +Use/NG+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:le           K      ; ! N
!             +Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:læ           K      ; !
                      +Ind+Prs+ConNeg:la           K      ;
                      +Ind+Prt+ConNeg:lim          K      ;
                      +Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:lam          K      ; !Variant,  used in Anta Pirak
                         +Cond+ConNeg:lulu         K      ;
!                        +Cond+ConNeg:galga#lulu   K      ;
!                        +Cond+ConNeg:máhtá#lulu   K      ;
                          +Pot+ConNeg:littja       K      ;

! Conditional and Potentional
                                                   LULU   ;
!                                                  LITTJA ; !potensialis given above

LEXICON LULU !!= @CODE@
           +Cond+Sg1:luluv      K ;
  +Err/Orth+Cond+Sg1:lulujiv      K ;
           +Cond+Sg2:lulu       K ;
           +Cond+Sg3:luluj      K ;
  +Err/Orth+Cond+Sg3:lului      K ;
           +Cond+Du1:lulujma    K ;
           +Cond+Du2:lulujda    K ;
  +Err/Orth+Cond+Du1:lulujme    K ; !
  +Err/Orth+Cond+Du2:lulujde    K ; !
           +Cond+Du3:lulujga    K ;
  +Err/Orth+Cond+Du3:luluba    K ;
           +Cond+Pl1:lulujma    K ;
  +Err/Orth+Cond+Pl1:lulup      K ; !Gives typos lulup
  +Err/Orth+Cond+Pl1:lulujme    K ; !
           +Cond+Pl2:lulujda    K ;
  +Err/Orth+Cond+Pl2:lulujde    K ; !
           +Cond+Pl3:lulun      K ;
  +Err/Orth+Cond+Pl3:lulujin    K ; !Gives very common typos lulujin.
  +Err/Orth+Cond+Pl3:luluji     K ; !Gives very common typos lulujin.
  
  
  
! +Cond:galga#lulu%> V-ODD-PRET ;
! +Cond:máhtá#lulu%> V-ODD-PRET ;

!LEXICON LITTJA !!= @CODE@
!  +Pot:li%>         V-ODD-POT  ;

LEXICON V-ODD-PRET
           +Sg1:v      K ;
           +Sg2:       K ;
           +Sg3:j      K ;
           +Du1:jma    K ;
           +Du2:jda    K ;
  +Du1+Err/Orth:jme    K ; !
  +Du2+Err/Orth:jde    K ; !
           +Du3:jga    K ;
           +Pl1:jma    K ;
  +Err/Orth+Pl1:jme    K ; !
           +Pl2:jda    K ;
  +Err/Orth+Pl2:jde    K ; !
           +Pl3:n      K ;


!LEXICON V-ODD-POT
!      +Prs+Sg1:lav    K ;
!      +Prs+Sg2:la     K ;
!      +Prs+Sg3:la     K ;
!      +Prs+Du1:lin    K ;
!      +Prs+Du2:lihppe K ;
!      +Prs+Du3:libá   K ;
!      +Prs+Pl1:lip    K ;
!      +Prs+Pl2:lihpit K ;
!      +Prs+Pl3:li     K ;


!! ## Modals
! - - - -
